Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Article 4. Embankments on Streams

§ 945.
Proceedings.

When it is necessary for the protection of a highway to erect an embankment or dike upon the banks of a stream, and the owner of the stream or of the lands adjacent will not permit town officials to enter upon the lands for this purpose, or requires them to pay a greater sum than in their judgment they ought to pay, the selectboard may take the land following the procedures established in section 923 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.